dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="جی/نا__vblex_vf">
      <e><p>          <l>وں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>وں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>و</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>یں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>تیں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ا</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ی</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ں</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ے</l><r>نا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="کاتنا"><i>کات</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="جننا"><i>جن</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="پرنا"><i>پر</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="نوازنا"><i>نواز</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="کھدیڑنا"><i>کھدیڑ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="گھُٹنا"><i>گھُٹ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="کھنکارنا"><i>کھنکار</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="بسورنا"><i>بسور</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="پکارنا"><i>پکار</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="سجھنا"><i>سجھ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="موندنا"><i>موند</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="کانپنا"><i>کانپ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="پسارنا"><i>پسار</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="تراشنا"><i>تراش</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="دھکیلنا"><i>دھکیل</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="گانٹھنا"><i>گانٹھ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="کریدنا"><i>کرید</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="جھیلنا"><i>جھیل</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="توٹنا"><i>توٹ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="چھیڑنا"><i>چھیڑ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="گھورنا"><i>گھور</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="ناپنا"><i>ناپ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="چھاننا"><i>چھان</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="کرلینا"><i>کرلی</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="پہچاننا"><i>پہچان</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="جینا"><i>جی</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="بیچنا"><i>بیچ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="گھرنا"><i>گھر</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="پوجنا"><i>پوج</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="اونگھنا"><i>اونگھ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="رہنا"><i>رہ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="کردینا"><i>کردی</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="چکنا"><i>چک</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="تھوکنا"><i>تھوک</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="کوسنا"><i>کوس</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="دھتکارنا"><i>دھتکار</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="سنوارنا"><i>سنوار</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="نگلنا"><i>نگل</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="جھگڑنا"><i>جھگڑ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="چاہنا"><i>چاہ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="گھوٹنا"><i>گھوٹ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="چھیننا"><i>چھین</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="چوکنا"><i>چوک</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="لپیٹنا"><i>لپیٹ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="دوہنا"><i>دوہ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="جاننا"><i>جان</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="میٹنا"><i>میٹ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="کودنا"><i>کود</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="جھانکنا"><i>جھانک</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="دھکنا"><i>دھک</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="پھلنا"><i>پھل</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
    <e lm="امنڈنا"><i>امنڈ</i><par n="جی/نا__vblex_vf"/></e>
